Wisconsin, session 2025, SB312.
do enact as follows:SB312,14Section 1. 69.01 (1m) of the statutes is created to read:SB312,2,2569.01 (1m) “Biological sex” means the biological state of being female or male 1based on sex chromosomes, without regard to psychological, chosen, or subjective 2experience of gender.SB312,23Section 2. 69.115 of the statutes is created to read:SB312,2,5469.115 Biological sex on a birth record. No person may change the sex of 5a registrant on a birth record to a sex other than the registrant’s biological sex.SB312,36Section 3. 69.12 (2m) of the statutes is created to read:SB312,2,8769.12 (2m) A court may not order amendment of the sex of a registrant on a 8birth record to a sex other than the registrant’s biological sex.SB312,49Section 4. 69.15 (1) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB312,2,111069.15 (1) (a) The order provides for an adoption, or name change or name 11change with sex change or establishes paternity; andSB312,512Section 5. 69.15 (4) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB312,2,201369.15 (4) (b) Any person with a direct and tangible interest in a birth record 14registered in this state may petition a court to change the name and sex of the 15registrant on the record due to a surgical sex-change procedure. If the state 16registrar receives an order which provides for such a change the state registrar 17shall change the name and sex on the original record, except that if the court orders 18the state registrar to prepare a new record the state registrar shall prepare a new 19record under sub. (6). This subsection does not apply to a name change prohibited 20under s. 301.47.SB312,621Section 6. Initial applicability.SB312,2,2322(1) The treatment of ss. 69.12 (2m) and 69.15 (1) (a) first applies to a court 23order issued on the effective date of this subsection.SB312,3,224(2) The treatment of s. 69.15 (4) (b) first applies to a petition filed under s. 169.15 (4) (b) on the effective date of this subsection or a court order issued on the 2effective date of this subsection.SB312,3,33